Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 1. General Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals §§ 255 to 289.

What are protected activities of miners under § 105(c)(1) of the federal Mine Safety and Health Act of 1977 (30 USC § 815(c)(1)), 67 ALR Fed 554.

58 C.J.S. Mines and Minerals §§ 424 to 446.

§ 30-3-101.
Applicability of W.S. 30-3-101 through 30-3-509.

W.S.

30-3-101

through

30-3-509

apply to all mines and mining operations except where:

A statute refers to a specific type of mine or mining operation; or

By the nature of the mine or mining operation, a statute can have no application.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 30-3-102.
Reasonable safety regulations and precautions; enumeration of general safety rules; hazards to be posted; care of tools.

Reasonable safety regulations and precautions shall be observed in all phases of all mining activities to provide a safe place for persons to work and to avoid injury and accident.

No apparatus, piece of equipment, machinery or tool shall be used when not in good repair or working condition or for any purpose for which it is not intended or suited.

No work shall be permitted in any unsafe place unless it is for the purpose of making the place safe, and then only by experienced persons under the supervision of a qualified person.

Special precautions shall be observed in operations where gas has been found to exist in dangerous quantity.

Appropriate signs shall be posted where dangerous or temporary hazards exist.

Good housekeeping shall be practiced in and around all mining activities, including cleanliness, orderly and safe storage of materials, and the removal of possible sources of injury such as stumbling hazards, protruding nails, broken glass, discarded equipment, supplies, containers, parts and other similar objects or materials.

Tools, except when in actual use, shall be kept in racks, boxes, kits, or where they will create no hazard.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 15; 1957, ch. 160, §§ 47, 57; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-64, 30-92, 30-150; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-401

, 30-2-429, 30-3-421; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-3-103.
Protective gear and clothing to be worn; clothing and devices to meet safety standards.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

All persons shall wear clothing and use protective devices required to meet recognized approved safety standards as specified by rule of the inspector. The rules shall include requirements for type and fit of clothing, footwear, eye protection and respiratory protection.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 63; 1957, ch. 160, § 35; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-72, 30-189; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-409

, 30-3-464; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2.

§ 30-3-104.
Working alone prohibited; exception.

No person shall be required to work alone in any hazardous place where his life might be endangered, unless he can communicate with others, can be heard or can be seen.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 61; W.S. 1957, § 30-96; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-433; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch 31, § 1.

§ 30-3-105.
Bulletin boards to be maintained for posting rules and regulations.

Bulletin boards shall be maintained at central locations in all mining operations and notices pertaining to safety rules and regulations and operations shall be posted on them. It shall be the responsibility of each employee to take notice, and be advised.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, §§ 31, 52; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-69, 30-87; W.S. 1977, §§

30-2-406

, 30-2-424; Laws 1981, ch. 9, § 1; 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 60.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-3-106.
Permissible methane detector required; permissible methods of testing for methane; examination of underground mine by mine examiners; procedure; written record.

At least two (2) permissible methane detectors in proper working condition shall be kept available at each mine for the use of authorized persons. Only permissible flame safety lamps, permissible methane detectors, or air sampling and analysis shall be used for determining the presence of methane in mine air. The number, type and other specifications for flame safety lamps, methane detectors and other air detectors required under specific circumstances shall be established by rule of the inspector.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Mine examiners shall examine all underground mines before other persons are permitted to enter. Specific areas of underground mines shall be subject to examination in accordance with rules of the inspector. The number, timing, schedule, place and conduct of all examinations shall be set by the rules. The rules shall require written verification of all required examinations.

The mine examiner shall:

Visit every live working place in the mine;

Test for methane;

Examine line brattices and fan tubing;

Test and inspect the roof, face and rib conditions in all places examined, including active roadways, travelways, approaches to abandoned workings and accessible falls in active sections for explosive gas and other hazards;

Ascertain that air is traveling in its regular course and in the required volume in each split;

Place his initials and the date at or near the face of each place examined.

Where dangerous conditions are found by the mine examiner or other official, the place shall be [posted] dangered off with an approved danger sign. Only an authorized person shall cross the sign and then only for the purpose of correcting the dangerous condition.

Upon completion of his examination, the mine examiner shall report to the mine foreman or a designated certified official before other persons enter the mine.

through (m) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

A certified mine foreman immediately directing the activities of the area subject to the report shall read and countersign the record book of the mine examiner daily. Any dangerous conditions disclosed in the reports shall be corrected promptly.

All records of daily and weekly reports shall be open for inspection by interested persons.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 30-160; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-435; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 5, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 30-3-107.
Inspections for safety hazards.

The operator of each mine, or some competent person designated by the operator, shall make inspections for safety hazards at least once, or oftener if necessary for safety, during each working shift, of all those parts of the operations which are traveled or being worked.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 49; W.S. 1957, § 30-84; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-421; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-3-108.
Requirements as to buildings generally; fire resistant structures required.

Buildings shall be constructed and located in a manner consistent with recognized good mining practice.

The inspector shall establish by rule requirements for fire resistant structures for areas in proximity to underground mine openings.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 30-68; W.S. 1977, §

30-2-405

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, § 1.

§ 30-3-109.
Check-in and check-out system.

Each mine shall have a check-in and check-out system that will identify every individual underground. An accurate record of persons in the mine consisting of a written record or a check board shall be kept on the surface in a place that will not be affected in the event of an explosion. The record shall bear a number identical to the identification check carried by the person underground.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 61; W.S. 1957, § 30-187; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-462; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-3-110.
Pits and quarries.

Reasonable precautions shall be taken to insure the safety of all persons working in and about open excavations, pits and quarries.

Overhanging banks shall not be permitted in any excavation, pit or quarry. Sides and banks shall be sloped to an angle, in view of the nature and material and the depth of the excavation, that will minimize the danger of materials sliding or falling.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 160, § 43; W.S. 1957, § 30-79; W.S. 1977, § 30-2-416; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-3-111.
Stairways and platforms.

Stairways, elevated platforms and runways shall be equipped with handrails.

Elevated platforms and stairways shall be provided with toeboards where necessary, kept clear of refuse and maintained in good repair.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 30-149; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-420; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-3-112.
Roofs of mines; minimum standards; supports; inspection.

Minimum standards for systematic roof control suitable to the roof conditions and mining system of each mine shall be adopted and complied with. A copy of any roof control plan approved by federal authorities shall be submitted to the inspector within thirty (30) days of its approval. Additional supports shall be installed where necessary to afford adequate protection. The inspector shall establish by rule requirements for roof bolting, other supports required to protect persons from falling or loose material, training requirements for persons involved with roof, rib and face testing and extraction of permanent and temporary timber.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Every shaft, incline, winze, adit, tunnel level or drift, and every working place in an underground mine shall be properly protected and sufficiently timbered or supported where necessary to protect persons from injury from falls of roof, ribs or face. Loose top and overhanging or loose faces and ribs shall be timbered adequately or taken down.

Timbers removed or knocked out deliberately or inadvertently shall be replaced promptly unless unnecessary for adequate roof support or protection.

The mine foreman and mine inspectors shall ascertain if employees understand roof, rib and face testing. Uninformed and new employees shall be instructed properly in correct methods of testing.

Face workers and other employees exposed to hazards from falls of rock and coal shall, unless this testing is specifically and satisfactorily performed by others, examine and test the roof, ribs and face before starting work or before starting a machine and frequently thereafter. When dangerous conditions are found, they shall be corrected immediately by taking down loose materials or by proper and adequate support before any other work is done.

At least once each day, the mine foreman shall examine roof, ribs, and face of working places and passageways, where men work or travel, for dangerous conditions. Where found, such dangerous conditions shall be corrected promptly.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Permanent timber extraction shall be done only by mechanical means. Persons engaged in this work shall not be permitted to work alone. Persons assigned to this work shall have not less than the practical mining experience under comparable conditions as required by rule of the inspector.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 17; 1957, ch. 160, § 56; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-91, 30-151; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-428, 30-3-422; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 5, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-3-113.
Rock dusting in coal mines.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

The inspector shall establish by rule for underground coal mines, areas in which rock dusting is required, required levels of incombustible content and other content and size requirements for rock dusting. The inspector or his deputies may require that sufficient samples of the mine dusts are taken in order to enforce this section.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 30-162; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-437; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-3-114.
Construction, installation and maintenance of track.

The roadbed, rails, joints, switches, frogs and other elements of the track of all haulage roads shall be constructed, installed and maintained in a manner consistent with speed and type of haulage operations being conducted to insure safe operation.

Track switches, except room and entry development switches, shall be provided with properly installed throws, bridle bars and guardrails; switch throws and stands, where possible, shall be placed on the clearance side.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 39; 1957, ch. 160, § 50; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-85, 30-165; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-2-422, 30-3-440; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to authority of mining companies relative to the construction of railroads, roads, etc., see §

30-1-128

.

§ 30-3-115.
Haulage roads; clearance space; shelter holes.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Ample clearance shall be provided at all points where supplies are loaded or unloaded along haulage roads or conveyors. The inspector shall establish by rule required clearances for haulage roads and conveyors. The rules shall include clearances required, requirements for suitable crossover or crossunder bridges and proper guards for travelways.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

Shelter holes shall be provided along haulage entries and slopes where locomotive, rope or shuttle-car haulage is used. The inspector shall establish by rule the spacing, sizing and placement of shelter holes which may vary for different locations in the mine.

through (m) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 30-166; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-441; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2.

Purpose of section. —

The main purpose of this statute is to make definite, or perhaps to enlarge, the employer's common-law duty to maintain its haulage-way in safe condition for workmen who, while acting within scope of employment, have occasion to be there. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1943) (construing former § 57-408, W.C.S. 1945).

Effect of employee's violation or work rule. —

Although the coal mine operator failed to provide holes for shelter and did not provide a 22-inch clearance as required by a former statute, it was not liable for the death of a miner resulting from the employee's violation of the employer's rule against entering the haulage-way. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1943) (construing former §§ 57-408 and 57-415, W.C.S. 1945).

§ 30-3-116.
Abandoned workings; posting at entrances; sealing or ventilation.

The entrances to abandoned workings shall be posted to warn unauthorized persons against entering the territory.

Abandoned workings shall be sealed or ventilated in accordance with rules adopted by the inspector.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 30-159; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-434; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2.

§ 30-3-117.
Abandoned workings; precautions required when working place approaches.

Whenever any working place approaches within two hundred (200) feet of abandoned workings that cannot be inspected, boreholes shall be kept as required by rule of the inspector. The rules shall include spacing and other drilling requirements for the bore holes.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 59; W.S. 1957, § 30-185; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-460; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, § 1.

§ 30-3-118.
Surface outlets; rules specifying surface opening and escapeway requirements.

Every underground mine shall have at least two (2) separate clearly marked outlets to the surface. The two (2) outlets to the surface need not belong to the same mine if persons can travel to and from another outlet to the mine.

The inspector shall adopt rules specifying other surface opening, travelway and escapeway requirements. The rules shall provide for adequate fire protection, ventilation and equipment, designated escapeways and limitations upon the number of persons allowed in the mine or specific areas of the mine based upon available escapeways.

through (m) Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 31, § 2.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 131, § 11; Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 60; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-186, 30-215; W.S. 1977, §§ 30-3-461, 30-4-305; Laws 1983, ch.11, § 2; 1995, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 14, ch. 131, Laws 1949, repealed all acts and statutory provisions and parts thereof inconsistent with that act.